Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 4
STATEWIDE MANAGED CARE SYSTEM

25.5-5-401. Short title.

This part 4 shall be known and may be cited as the "Statewide Managed Care System".

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1883, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-111 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-402. Statewide managed care system - rules - definitions - repeal.

The state board shall adopt rules to implement a statewide managed care system for Colorado medical assistance recipients pursuant to the provisions of this article 5 and articles 4 and 6 of this title 25.5. The statewide managed care system shall be implemented to the extent possible.

The statewide managed care system implemented pursuant to this article 5 does not include:

The services delivered under the residential child health-care program described in section 25.5-6-903, except in those counties in which there is a written agreement between the county department of human or social services, the designated and contracted MCE responsible for community behavioral health care, and the state department;

Long-term care services and the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly, as described in section 25.5-5-412. For purposes of this subsection (2), "long-term care services" means nursing facilities and home- and community-based services provided to eligible clients who have been determined to be in need of such services pursuant to the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act" and the state board's rules.

The statewide managed care system must include a statewide system of community behavioral health care that must:

Address the economic, social, and personal costs to the state of Colorado and its citizens of untreated behavioral health disorders, including mental health and substance use disorders;

Approach behavioral health disorders as treatable conditions not unlike other chronic health issues that require a combination of behavioral change and medication or other treatment;

Offer timely access through multiple points of entry to a full continuum of culturally responsive behavioral health services, including prevention, early intervention, crisis response, treatment, and recovery services, that support individuals living full, productive lives;

Provide coordination of care for the full continuum of substance use disorder and mental health treatment and recovery, including support for individuals transitioning between levels of care;

Feature a comprehensive and integrated system of quality behavioral health care that is individualized and coordinated to meet individuals' changing needs;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(e) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Be paid for by the state department establishing capitated rates specifically for community mental health services that account for a comprehensive continuum of needed services such as those provided by community mental health centers as defined in section 27-66-101;

(e)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(e) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Be paid for by the state department establishing capitated rates specifically for behavioral health services that account for a comprehensive continuum of needed services such as those provided by licensed behavioral health providers, including essential and comprehensive community behavioral health providers, as defined in section 27-50-101;

Make the behavioral health system's administrative processes, service delivery, and funding more effective and efficient to improve outcomes for Colorado citizens;

In addition to network adequacy requirements determined by the state department, require each MCE to offer an enrollee an initial or subsequent nonurgent care visit within a reasonable period where medically necessary and at appropriate therapeutic intervals, as determined by state board rule;

Specify that the diagnosis of an intellectual or developmental disability, a neurological or neurocognitive disorder, or a traumatic brain injury does not preclude an individual from receiving a covered behavioral health service; and

Require an MCE to cover all medically necessary covered treatments for covered behavioral health diagnoses, regardless of any co-occurring conditions.

(3.5) (a) No later than July 1, 2023, the state department, in collaboration with the behavioral health administration in the department of human services and other state agencies, shall develop the universal contract as described in section 27-50-203.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate three million dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund, created in section 24-75-230, to the state department for the development, implementation, and administration of the universal contract.

This subsection (3.5)(b) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

The statewide managed care system must promote the utilization of the medical home model of care for all enrolled members. The medical home model of care establishes a focal point of care for comprehensive primary care and efficient coordination with specialty care providers and other health-care systems. The medical home model has proven effective in promoting early intervention and prevention, improving individuals' health, and reducing health-care costs.

The statewide managed care system builds upon the lessons learned from previous managed care and community behavioral health-care programs in the state in order to reduce barriers that may negatively impact medicaid recipient experience, medicaid recipient health, and efficient use of state resources. The statewide managed care system is authorized to provide services under a single MCE type or a combination of MCE types.

The state department is authorized to assign a medicaid recipient to a particular MCE, consistent with federal requirements and rules promulgated by the state board.

For a child or youth who obtains eligibility for services under the state's medicaid program through a dependency and neglect action resulting in out-of-home placement pursuant to article 3 of title 19 or a juvenile delinquency action resulting in out-of-home placement pursuant to article 2.5 of title 19, the state department shall assign the child or youth to the MCE covering the county with jurisdiction over the action. The state department shall only change the assignment if the change is requested by the county with jurisdiction over the action or by the child's or youth's legal guardian.

The state department is authorized to enter into a contract with MCOs, PCCM Entities, prepaid ambulatory health plans, and prepaid inpatient health plans, subject to the receipt of any required federal authorizations and pursuant to the requirements of this section.

(7.5) (a) The state department shall offer to enter into a direct contract with the MCO operated by or under the control of Denver health and hospital authority, created pursuant to article 29 of title 25, until the MCO ceases to operate a medicaid managed care program or until June 30, 2025, unless sooner reprocured. If the state department designates an MCO to manage behavioral health services pursuant to this article 5, Denver health and hospital authority, or any subsidiary thereof, shall collaborate with the MCO during the term of contract.

The MCO operated by or under the control of Denver health and hospital authority shall:

Maintain adequate financials to ensure proper solvency as a risk manager;

Accept rates determined by the state department, through standard methodologies, to cover the population it is serving;

Maintain service and quality metrics, as determined by the state department; and

Meet statewide managed care system standards and operate as part of the overall managed care system.

Waivers. The implementation of this part 4 is conditioned, to the extent applicable, on the issuance of necessary waivers by the federal government. The provisions of this part 4 must be implemented to the extent authorized by federal waiver, if so required by federal law.

Bidding.

The state department is authorized to institute a program for competitive bidding pursuant to section 24-103-202 or 24-103-203 for MCEs seeking to provide, arrange for, or otherwise be responsible for the provision of services to its enrollees. The state department is authorized to award contracts to more than one offeror. The state department shall use competitive bidding procedures to encourage competition and improve the quality of care available to medicaid recipients over the long term that meets the requirements of this section and section 25.5-5-406.1.

On or before January 1, 2023, in order to promote transparency and accountability, the state department shall require each MCE that has twenty-five percent or more ownership by providers of behavioral health services to comply with the following conflict of interest policies:

Providers who have ownership or board membership in an MCE shall not have control, influence, or decision-making authority in the establishment of provider networks.

Each MCE shall report quarterly the number of providers who applied to join the network and were denied and a comparison of rate ranges for providers who have ownership or board membership versus providers who do not.

An employee of a contracted provider of an MCE shall not also be an employee of the MCE unless the employee is a clinical officer or utilization management director of the MCE. If the individual is also an employee of a provider that has board membership or ownership in the MCE, the MCE shall develop policies, approved by the executive director of the state department, to mitigate any conflict of interest the employee may have.

An MCE's board shall not have more than fifty percent of contracted providers as board members, and the MCE is encouraged to have a community member on the MCE's board.

No later than July 1, 2025, the state department shall appropriately address perceived or actual provider ownership and control of MCEs participating in the statewide managed care system in the interest of transparency and accountability. In designing a competitive bidding process, the state department shall incorporate community feedback and have a public process related to governing requirements, including how to address conflicts of interest.

As used in this subsection (9)(b):

"Clinical officer" means a physician who provides the clinical vision for the MCE or provides clinical direction to network management, quality improvement, utilization management, or credentialing divisions.

"MCE" means a managed care entity responsible for the statewide system of community behavioral health care, as described in section 25.5-5-402 (3), and is not owned, operated by, or affiliated with an instrumentality, municipality, or political subdivision of the state.

"Ownership" means an individual who is a legal proprietor of an organization, including a provider or individual who owns assets of an organization, or has a financial stake, interest, or governance role in the MCE.

"Utilization management director" means a licensed health-care professional with behavioral health clinical experience who leads and develops the utilization management program or manages the medical review and authorization process.

An MCE that is contracting for a defined scope of services under a risk contract shall certify the financial stability of the MCE pursuant to criteria established by the division of insurance.

The state department shall conduct a review of each MCE, in accordance with federal requirements, prior to the implementation of a contract to assess the ability and capacity of the MCE to satisfactorily perform the operational requirements of the contract.

Graduate medical education. The state department shall continue the graduate medical education, referred to in this subsection (12) as "GME", funding to teaching hospitals that have graduate medical education expenses in their medicare cost report and are participating as providers under one or more MCEs with a contract with the state department under this part 4. GME funding for recipients enrolled in an MCE is excluded from the premiums paid to the MCE and must be paid directly to the teaching hospital. The state board shall adopt rules to implement this subsection (12) and establish the rate and method of reimbursement.

Nothing in this part 4 creates an exemption from the applicable provisions of title 10.

Nothing in this part 4 creates an entitlement to an MCE to contract with the state department.

On or before July 1, 2020, the state department shall include utilization management guidelines for the MCEs in the state board's managed care rules.

The state department shall provide information on its website specifying how the public may request the network adequacy plan and quarterly network reports for an MCE. The plan must include actions taken by the MCE to ensure that all necessary and covered primary care, care coordination, and behavioral health services are provided to enrollees with reasonable promptness. Such actions include, without limitation:

Utilizing single case agreements with out-of-network providers when necessary; and

Using financial incentives to increase network participation.

If the state department receives a complaint from the office of the ombudsman for behavioral health access to care established pursuant to part 3 of article 80 of title 27 that relates to possible violations of subsection (3) of this section or the MHPAEA, the state department shall examine the complaint, as requested by the office, and shall report to the office in a timely manner any actions taken related to the complaint.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1883, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3) and (5) amended, p. 390, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(6) added, (HB 12-1281), ch. 246, p. 1187, § 3, effective June 4.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended with relocations, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1877, § 1, effective August 8; IP(2) and (2)(a) amended, (HB 18-1328), ch. 184, p. 1244, § 6, effective June 7, 2019.

L. 2019:

(3)(e) amended and (3)(g), (3)(h), (3)(i), (15), (16), and (17) added, (HB 19-1269), ch. 195, p. 2133, § 12, effective May 16; (7.5) added, (HB 19-1285), ch. 392, p. 3501, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(6) amended, (HB 20-1237), ch. 271, p. 1319, § 1, effective July 11; (3)(c.5) added, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1391, § 7, effective July 13.

L. 2021:

(6)(b) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 747, § 123, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(9) amended, (SB 22-106), ch. 196, p. 1309, § 1, effective May 20; (3.5) added, (HB 22-1302), ch. 180, p. 1200, § 3, effective July 1; (3)(e) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1594, § 234, effective July 1, 2024.

25.5-5-403. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

Repealed.

"Essential community provider", referred to in this part 4 as an "ECP", means a health-care provider that:

Has historically served medically needy or medically indigent patients and that demonstrates a commitment to serve low-income and medically indigent populations who comprise a significant portion of its patient population or, in the case of a sole community provider, serves the medically indigent patients within its medical capability; and

Waives charges or charges for services on a sliding scale based on income and does not restrict access or services because of a client's financial limitations.

(2.5) "Global payment" means a population-based payment mechanism that is constructed on a per-member, per-month calculation. Global payments must account for prospective local community or health system cost trends and value, as measured by quality and satisfaction metrics, and incorporate community cost experience and reported encounter data to the greatest extent possible to address regional variation and improve longitudinal performance. Risk adjustments, risk-sharing, and aligned payment incentives may be utilized to achieve performance improvement. The rate calculations for global payment are exempt from the provisions of section 25.5-5-408. An entity that uses global payment pursuant to section 25.5-5-402 shall meet the applicable financial solvency requirements of sections 25.5-5-402 (10) and 25.5-5-408 (1)(f) and the essential community provider requirements of sections 25.5-5-406.1 (1)(f)(II) and 25.5-5-408 (1)(d).

"Managed care" means a health-care delivery system organized to manage costs, utilization, and quality. Medicaid managed care provides for the delivery of medicaid health benefits and additional services through contracted arrangements between state medicaid agencies and MCEs.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the benefits authorized for recipients of the state medical assistance program.

"Managed care entity", referred to in this part 4 as an "MCE", means an entity that enters into a contract to provide services in the statewide managed care system, including MCOs, prepaid inpatient health plans, prepaid ambulatory health plans, and PCCM Entities.

"Managed care organization", referred to in this part 4 as an "MCO", means an entity contracting with the state department that meets the definition of managed care organization as defined in 42 CFR 438.2.

(5.5) "Medical home" means an appropriately qualified medical health-care practice that verifiably ensures continuous access to comprehensive, accessible, and coordinated community-based primary care. All medical homes may have, but are not limited to, the following:

Health maintenance and preventive care;

Anticipatory guidance and health education;

Acute and chronic illness care;

Coordination of medications, specialists, and therapies;

Provider participation in hospital care; and

Mental health care, oral health care, and other related services, as appropriate.

(5.7) "MHPAEA" means the federal "Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008", Pub.L. 110-343, as amended, and all of its implementing and related regulations.

"Prepaid ambulatory health plan", referred to in this part 4 as a "PAHP", means an entity contracting with the state department that meets the definition of prepaid ambulatory health plan as defined in 42 CFR 438.2.

"Prepaid inpatient health plan", referred to in this part 4 as "PIHP", means an entity contracting with the state department that meets the definition of prepaid inpatient health plan as defined in 42 CFR 438.2.

(7.5) "Primary care case management entity", referred to in this part 4 as a "PCCM Entity", means an entity contracting with the state department that meets the definition of primary care case management entity as defined in 42 CFR 438.2.

"Primary care case manager", referred to in this part 4 as a "PCCM", means a physician, a physician group practice, or other practitioner as identified by the state that meets the definition of primary care case manager as defined in 42 CFR 438.2.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1884, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1354, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 390, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(2.5) added, (HB 12-1281), ch. 246, p. 1187, § 4, effective June 4.

L. 2018:

(1) repealed, (2.5), (3)(a), (4), and (8) amended, and (5.5) and (7.5) added (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1881, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(5.7) added, (HB 19-1269), ch. 195, p. 2134, § 13, effective May 16.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-114 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

(1) For additional definitions applicable to this part 4, see § 25.5-4-103.

(2) For the short title ("Behavioral Health Care Coverage Modernization Act") in HB 19-1269, see section 1 of chapter 195, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-5-404. Selection of managed care entities. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1885, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 392, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

(1)(v) added, (HB 14-1211), ch. 253, p. 1011, § 2, effective January 1, 2015.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1891, § 7, effective August 8.

25.5-5-405. Quality measurements. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1889, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1891, § 7, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 26-4-116 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-406. Required features of managed care system. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1889, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 396, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (HB 12-1281), ch. 246, p. 1187, § 5, effective June 4.

L. 2016:

(1)(f)(I) amended, (HB 16-1081), ch. 22, p. 53, § 9, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1891, § 7, effective August 8.

25.5-5-406.1. Required features of statewide managed care system.

General features. All medicaid managed care programs must contain the following general features, in addition to others that the federal government, state department, and state board consider necessary for the effective and cost-efficient operation of those programs:

The MCE shall accept all enrollees that the state department assigns to the MCE in the order in which they are assigned, without restriction, regardless of health status or need for health-care services;

The MCE shall not discriminate against enrolled members on the basis of race, color, ethnic or national origin, ancestry, age, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, religion, creed, or political beliefs, and shall not use any policy or practice that has the effect of discriminating on the basis of race, color, ethnic or national origin, ancestry, age, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, disability, religion, creed, or political beliefs;

The MCE shall allow each enrolled member to choose his or her network provider to the extent possible and appropriate;

Notwithstanding any waivers authorized by the federal department of health and human services, or any successor agency, each contract between the state department and an MCE selected to participate in the statewide managed care system under this part 4 shall comply with the requirements of 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396a (a)(23)(B);

The MCE shall ensure access to care for all enrolled members in need of medically necessary services covered in the contract;

The MCE shall create, administer, and maintain a network of providers, building on the current network of medicaid providers, to serve the health-care needs of its members. In doing so, the MCE shall:

Support providers in serving the medicaid population and implement value-based payment methodologies for network providers that incentivize and reward providers for the effective and efficient delivery of high-quality services to enrolled members;

Seek proposals from each ECP in a county in which the MCE is enrolling recipients for those services that the MCE provides or intends to provide and that an ECP provides or is capable of providing. The MCE shall consider such proposals in good faith and shall, when deemed reasonable by the MCE based on the needs of its enrollees, contract with ECPs. Each ECP shall be willing to negotiate on reasonably equitable terms with each MCE. ECPs making proposals under this subsection (1)(f)(II) must be able to meet the contractual requirements of the MCE. The requirements of this subsection (1)(f)(II) do not apply to an MCE in areas in which the MCE operates entirely as a group health maintenance organization.

In selecting MCEs, the state department shall not penalize an MCE for paying cost-based reimbursement to federally qualified health centers as defined in the federal "Social Security Act".

Demonstrate that there are sufficient Indian health-care providers participating in the provider network to ensure timely access to services available under the contract from such providers for Indian enrollees who are eligible to receive services.

The MCE shall ensure that its contracted network providers are capable of serving all members, including contracting with providers with specialized training and expertise across all ages, levels of ability, gender identities, and cultural identities;

The MCE shall meet the network adequacy standards, as established by the state department, describing the maximum time and distance an enrolled member is expected to travel in order to access the provider types covered under the state contract;

The MCE shall meet, and require its network providers to meet, standards as established by the state department for timely access to care and services, taking into account the urgency of the need for services;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(j) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The MCE shall not interfere with appropriate medical care decisions rendered by its contracted network providers;

(j)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(j) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

(I) The MCE shall not interfere with appropriate medical care decisions rendered by its contracted network providers;

(II) A prepaid inpatient health plan shall not require prior authorization for outpatient psychotherapy services, as defined in the most recent version of the "Current Procedural Terminology", as developed and copyrighted by the American Medical Association or its successor entity;

The MCE shall comply with the state department's transition of care policy to ensure continued access to services during a transition from fee-for-service to an MCE or transition from one MCE to another when an enrollee, in the absence of continued access to services, would suffer serious detriment to his or her health or be at risk of hospitalization or institutionalization;

The MCE shall provide and facilitate the delivery of services in a culturally competent manner to all members, including those with limited English proficiency, diverse cultural and ethnic backgrounds, and disabilities, and regardless of gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression;

The MCE shall provide communications in a manner and format that may be easily understood and is readily accessible by members;

Grievances and appeals. (I) (A) Each MCE shall establish a grievance and appeal system that complies with rules established by the state board and federal government.

(B) An enrollee is entitled to designate a representative, including but not limited to an attorney, the ombudsman for medicaid managed care, a lay advocate, or the enrollee's physician, to file and pursue a grievance or appeal on behalf of the enrollee. The procedure must allow for the unencumbered participation of physicians.

(II) The MCE shall have an established grievance system that allows for client expression of dissatisfaction at any time about any matter related to the MCE's contracted services, other than an adverse benefit determination. The grievance system must provide timely resolution of such matters in a manner consistent with the medical needs of the individual recipient.

(III) (A) The MCE shall have an appeal system for review of any determination by the MCE to deny a service authorization request or to authorize a service in an amount, duration, or scope that is less than requested.

(B) Each MCE shall utilize an appeal process for expedited reviews that complies with rules established by the state board. The appeal process for expedited reviews must provide a means by which an enrollee may complain and seek resolution concerning any action or failure to act in an emergency situation that immediately impacts the enrollee's access to quality health-care services, treatments, or providers.

(C) The state department shall establish the position of ombudsman for medicaid managed care. The ombudsman shall, if the enrollee requests, act as the enrollee's representative in resolving appeals with the MCE. It is the intent of the general assembly that the ombudsman for medicaid managed care be independent from the state department and selected through a competitive bidding process. In the event the state department is unable to contract with an independent ombudsman, an employee of the state department may serve as the ombudsman for medicaid managed care. An enrollee whose appeal is not resolved to his or her satisfaction by a procedure described in this subsection (1)(n), or whose appeal is deemed exhausted, is entitled to request a state fair hearing by an independent hearing officer, further judicial review, or both, as provided for by federal law and any state statute or rule.

The MCE shall maintain and participate in an ongoing comprehensive quality assessment and performance improvement program that must include but not be limited to the following:

Performance improvement projects designed to achieve significant improvement, sustained over time, in clinical care and nonclinical care areas that are expected to have a favorable effect on health outcomes and member satisfaction;

The collection and submission of performance measurement data as required by the state department;

The implementation and maintenance of mechanisms to detect overutilization and underutilization of services and to assess the quality and appropriateness of care furnished to its members, including members with special health-care needs; and

Annual participation in an independent quality review and validation of performance improvement projects, performance measures, and other contract requirements;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(p) is effective until January 1, 2023.] The MCE shall administer a program integrity system to ensure compliance with all requirements established by the federal government, state of Colorado, state department, and state board that includes, but is not limited to:

Procedures to detect and prevent fraud, waste, and abuse;

Screening and disclosure processes to prevent relationships with individuals or entities that are debarred, suspended, or otherwise excluded from participating in any federal health-care program, procurement activities, or nonprocurement activities; and

Treatment of recoveries of overpayment to providers;

(p)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(p)(I) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

(I) The MCE shall administer a program integrity system to ensure compliance with all requirements established by the federal government, state of Colorado, state department, and state board that includes, but is not limited to:

Procedures to detect and prevent fraud, waste, and abuse;

Screening and disclosure processes to prevent relationships with individuals or entities that are debarred, suspended, or otherwise excluded from participating in any federal health-care program, procurement activities, or nonprocurement activities; and

Treatment of recoveries of overpayment to providers;

(II) Prepaid inpatient health plans shall not retroactively recover provider payments if:

(A) A recipient was initially determined to be eligible for medical benefits pursuant to section 25.5-4-205 when the provider has an eligibility guarantee number for the recipient; or

(B) The prepaid inpatient health plan makes an error processing the claim but the claim is otherwise accurately submitted by the provider.

(III) (A) Prepaid inpatient health plans shall not retroactively recover provider payments after twelve months from the date a claim was paid, except when medicare, commercial insurance, or third-party liability is the primary payer for a claim; the claim is the subject of a state or federal audit, including audits contractually required by the state department; the claim is subject to a law enforcement investigation; the claim submitted is a duplicate; the claim is fraudulent; the provider improperly bills the claim; or the claim is submitted with a billing code or diagnosis code that inaccurately or incorrectly resulted in reimbursement or bypassed prior authorization requirements.

(B) If a prepaid inpatient health plan retroactively recovers a provider payment that is equal to one thousand dollars or more, the prepaid inpatient health plan shall work with the provider to develop a payment plan if the provider requests a payment plan.

Billing medicaid recipients. Notwithstanding any federal regulations or the general prohibition of section 25.5-4-301 against providers billing medicaid recipients, a provider may bill a medicaid recipient who is enrolled with a specific medicaid PCCM or MCE and, in circumstances defined by the rules of the state board, receives care from a medical provider outside that organization's network or without referral by the recipient's PCCM;

Marketing. In marketing coverage to medicaid recipients, all MCEs shall comply with all applicable provisions of title 10 regarding health plan marketing. The state board is authorized to promulgate rules concerning the permissible marketing of medicaid managed care. The purposes of such rules must include but not be limited to the avoidance of biased selection among the choices available to medicaid recipients.

Prescription drugs. All MCEs that have prescription drugs as a covered benefit shall provide prescription drug coverage in accordance with the provisions of section 25.5-5-202 (1)(a) as part of a comprehensive health benefit and with respect to any formulary or other access restrictions:

The MCE shall supply participating providers who may prescribe prescription drugs for MCE enrollees with a current copy of such formulary or other access restrictions, including information about coverage, payment, or any requirement for prior authorization;

The MCE shall provide to all medicaid recipients at periodic intervals, and prior to and during enrollment upon request, clear and concise information about the prescription drug program in language understandable to the medicaid recipients, including information about such formulary or other access restrictions and procedures for gaining access to prescription drugs, including off-formulary products; and

The MCE shall follow state department policies for prescribing any prescription drugs that are not covered under the MCE contract;

Each MCE must include the following statements prominently in the enrollee handbook, on the state department's website, and on the MCE's enrollment website:

A statement indicating that the MCE is subject to the MHPAEA and that a denial, restriction, or withholding of benefits for behavioral health services that are covered under the medical assistance program could be a potential violation of that act; and

A statement directing the enrollee to contact the office of the ombudsman for behavioral health access to care established pursuant to part 3 of article 80 of title 27 if the enrollee wants further assistance pursuing action regarding potential parity violations, which statement must include the telephone number for the office and a link to the office's website.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added with relocations, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1882, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(t) added, (HB 19-1269), ch. 195, p. 2134, § 14, effective May 16; (1)(o)(IV) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3473, § 38, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1)(b) and (1)(l) amended, (HB 21-1108), ch. 156, p. 896, § 40, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(1)(j) and (1)(p) amended, (SB 22-156), ch. 153, p. 978, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

Provisions of this section are similar to provisions of former §§ 25.5-5-404, 25.5-5-405, and 25.5-5-406, as they existed prior to 2018. For a detailed comparison of this section, see the comparative tables located at the back of the index.

Cross references:

(1) For the short title ("Behavioral Health Care Coverage Modernization Act") in HB 19-1269, see section 1 of chapter 195, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1108, see section 1 of chapter 156, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

25.5-5-407. State department recommendations - primary care physician program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1893, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1891, § 7, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 26-4-118 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-407.5. Prepaid inpatient health plan agreements - rules. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1351, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2009:

(1.5) added, (SB 09-265), ch. 205, p. 936, § 3, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(1.5) repealed, (HB 10-1382), ch. 217, p. 939, § 2, effective May 6.

L. 2013:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 13-044), ch. 54, p. 180, § 1, effective March 22.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1891, § 7, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2)(a) was relocated to § 25.5-5-408 (13) in 2018. For a detailed comparison of this section, see the comparative tables located at the back of the index.

25.5-5-407.7. Disability care coordination organization - rules. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1352, § 1, effective May 29.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1909, § 109, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (SB 13-276), ch. 256, p. 1353, § 9, effective May 23.